Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3302
Repealed. Laws 2018, LB377, § 87. Operative date January 1, 2019. County school administrator; contract authorized.

The county board of any county may contract with the educational service unit of which it is a part, with a Class II, III, IV, V, or VI school district, or with an individual who holds a Nebraska certificate to administer, to be a county school administrator for Class I school districts in the county and to perform other designated county educational activities. Any contract entered into under this section shall not exceed a period of one year. The county school administrator, with the approval of the county board, shall have the authority to employ such other persons as may be necessary to assist the county school administrator in the performance of his or her duties.

Laws 1973, LB 402, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 220;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 79-320.01;

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 27;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 110;

Laws 1997, LB 806, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 12;

Laws 2003, LB 685, § 1.